en: buckwheat husk, buckwheat hull
hr: heljdina ljuska
it: guscio di grano saraceno
pl: łuska gryki, łuski gryki

en: buckwheat grain
fr: graines de sarrasin
hr: zrno heljde
it: chicchi di grano saraceno, grano saraceno in chicchi
sr: крупа гречневая ядрица

en: sprouted buckwheat, buckwheat sprouts
hr: proklijala heljda
it: germogli di grano saraceno
pl: kiełki gryki

en: buckwheat flakes
da: boghvedeflager
de: Buchweizenflocken, Buchweizenflakes
es: copos de sarraceno
fi: tattarihiutale
fr: flocons de sarrasin, pétales de sarrasin
hr: pahuljice od heljde
hu: hajdinapehely
it: fiocchi di grano saraceno
nl: boekweitvlokken, boekweitflakes
pl: płatki gryczane, płatki gryki
sv: boveteflingor

en: whole buckwheat flakes
es: copos de trigo sarraceno integral
fr: flocons de sarrasin complets
hr: cijele pahuljice od heljde
it: fiocchi integrali di grano saraceno, fiocchi di grano saraceno integrale
nl: volle boekweitvlokken

en: buckwheat grit
hr: heljdina krupica
it: granella di grano saraceno
nl: boekweitgrut

en: buckwheat flour
bg: брашно от елда
da: boghvedemel
de: Buchweizenmehl
el: αλέυρι φαγόπυρου
es: harina de sarraceno, harina de alforfon
fi: tattarijauho
fr: farine de sarrasin, farine de blé noir
hr: heljdino brašno
hu: hajdinaliszt
it: farina di grano saraceno, farina di saraceno
ja: 蕎麦粉, そば粉
nb: bokhvetemel
nl: boekweitmeel
pl: mąka gryczana
pt: farinha de trigo mourisco
ru: мука гречневая
sl: ajdova moka
sv: bovetemjöl

en: extruded buckwheat flour
hr: ekstrudirano heljdino brašno
it: estruso di farina di grano saraceno, farina di grano saraceno estrusa, farina di estruso di grano saraceno

en: whole grain buckwheat flour
de: Buchweizenvollkornmehl, Buchweizen-Vollkornmehl
fr: farine de sarrasin complète
hr: integralno heljdino brašno
it: farina integrale di grano saraceno, farina di grano saraceno integrale
nl: volkoren boekweitmeel

en: puffed buckwheat
de: Buchweizen gepufft, gepuffter Buchweizen
es: sarraceno inflados
fi: puffattu tattari
fr: sarrasin soufflé
hr: napuhana heljda
hu: puffasztott hajdina
it: grano saraceno soffiato
nl: gepofte boekweit

en: kasha, buckwheat kasha
ar: كشكاة
az: Qarabaşaq sıyığı
cv: Пăтă
de: Gretschnewaja Kascha
eo: Fagopira grio
es: kasha, kasza gryczana
et: Tatrapuder
fa: کاشا
fi: kasha
fr: kasha, Kacha
he: קאשה
hr: heljdina prekrupa
hu: hajdinakása
hy: Հնդկացորենի շիլա
it: kaša
ko: 카샤
lt: Grikių košė
lv: griķu biezputra
nl: kasha, Kasja
pl: kasza gryczana, kaszy gryczanej
pt: kasha
ru: гречневая каша
tr: Düğürcük çorbası
uk: гречана каша
zh: 卡莎

en: roasted buckwheat kasha
hr: pečena kaša od heljde
it: kasha di grano saraceno tostato
pl: kasza gryczana palona, kasza gryczana prażona

en: rehydrated nuckwheat
fr: sarrasin réhydraté
hr: rehidrirana orahovina
it: grano saraceno reidratato

en: millet
af: manna
ar: دخن
ba: тары
be: проса
bg: просо
bo: ཁྲེ།
ca: mill
cs: jáhly
da: hirse
de: Hirse
dv: ކުދިބަތް
el: κεχρί, κέγχρος
eo: mileo
es: mijo
et: hirss
eu: artatxiki
fa: ارزن
fi: hirssi, viljahirssi
fr: millet
ga: muiléad
gl: paínzo
ha: gero
he: דוחן
hi: बाजरा
hr: proso
hu: köles
id: milet
io: milieto
it: miglio
ja: 雑穀
kn: ರಾಗಿ
ko: 서곡
ky: таруу
la: panicum miliaceum
li: hirs
lv: prosa
mi: miriti
ml: ചാമ
ms: sekoi
nb: hirse
nl: gierst
os: елцык
pa: ਬਾਜਰਾ
pl: proso, prosa, jaglana, jaglany, jaglane
ps: ږدن
pt: milhete, painço, milho-miúdo, milho-alvo
ro: mei
ru: пшено
sd: ٻاجهر
sh: proso
sl: proso
sn: rukweza
sr: просо
sv: hirs
sw: ulezi
ta: தினை
te: చిరుధాన్యం
tg: арзан
tr: darı
uk: пшоно
ur: باجرہ
uz: soʻk
vi: kê
zh: 杂谷

en: pearl millet, bajra
la: Pennisetum glaucum, Cenchrus americanus, Pennisetum typhoideum

en: little millet, samai
la: Panicum sumatrense, Panicum miliare

en: Kodo millet, varagu
la: Paspalum scrobiculatum

en: millet groats
hr: proso krupica
it: chicchi di miglio
pl: kasza jaglana, kaszy jaglanej
ru: Пшённая каша

en: sprouted millet
de: gekeimte Hirse, Hirsekeimling
es: millaje orgánado
hr: proklijalo proso
it: miglio germogliato
nl: gierstkiem, gierstkiemen

en: millet flakes
de: Hirseflocken
es: copos de mijo
fi: hirssihiutale
fr: flocons de millet
hr: pahuljice prosa
hu: kölespehely
it: fiocchi di miglio
nl: gierstvlokken
pl: płatki jaglane